Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1297
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 37-1293 to 37-1298 shall be construed to require the actual repair of a wrecked, damaged, or destroyed motorboat to be designated as salvage.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 10.